Wisconsin, session 2025, AB391.
do enact as follows:AB391,11Section 1. 121.905 (3) (c) 6. of the statutes is amended to read:AB391,2,42121.905 (3) (c) 6. For the limit for each of the 2015-16 to 2018-19 school years, 3for the 2021-22 school year, for the 2027-28 school year, and for any school year 4thereafter, make no adjustment to the result under par. (b).AB391,25Section 2. 121.905 (3) (c) 9. of the statutes is amended to read:AB391,2,76121.905 (3) (c) 9. For the limit for 2023-2425, add Add $325 to the result 7under par. (b) for the limit for the 2023-24 to 2026-2027 school years.AB391,38Section 3. 121.91 (2m) (j) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB391,2,129121.91 (2m) (j) (intro.) Notwithstanding par. (i) and except as provided in 10subs. (3), (4), and (8), a school district cannot increase its revenues for each school 11year beginning with the 2020-21 school year-year 2425 year and ending with the 122026-27 school year to an amount that exceeds the amount calculated as follows:AB391,413Section 4. 121.91 (2m) (t) 1. (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB391,2,2014121.91 (2m) (t) 1. (intro.) If 2 or more school districts are consolidated under 15s. 117.08 or 117.09, in the 2019-20 school year, the consolidated school district’s 16revenue limit shall be determined as provided under par. (im), in the 2020-21 school 17year, 2023-year 2425 to the 2026-27 school year, the consolidated school district’s 18revenue limit shall be determined as provided under par. (j), and in the 2027-28 19school year and each school year thereafter, the consolidated school district’s 20revenue limit shall be determined as provided under par. (i), except as follows:AB391,521Section 5. Effective date.AB391,2,2222(1) This act takes effect on January 1, 2027.AB391,2,2323